Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 16.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5731
Proprietor; duties.

A proprietor of a place of employment or public place where smoking is prohibited under the Nebraska Clean Indoor Air Act shall take necessary and appropriate steps to ensure compliance with the act at such place.

Laws 2008, LB395, § 16.
June 1, 2009